Nevada, session 83, AB413.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. Workforce Connections shall use the money
appropriated by section 2 of this act to develop, create and
administer the Southern Nevada Health Care Workforce
Apprenticeship Pilot Program for the purpose of addressing
shortages in the number of medical assistants and pharmaceutical
technicians in this State through the establishment of apprenticeship
programs for the training of such persons.
2. The Program must provide:
(a) For the establishment of apprenticeship programs in
Southern Nevada for the training of medical assistants and
pharmaceutical technicians. Any apprenticeship program established
under the Program must be registered and approved by the State
Apprenticeship Council pursuant to chapter 610 of NRS.
(b) Money for participants in the Program to cover the costs of
participating in the Program, including, without limitation, fees for
professional certifications and registrations, as applicable, for not
more than 100 apprentices who are enrolled in apprenticeship
programs established under the Program.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical assistant” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
630.0129 and 633.075.
(b) “Pharmaceutical technician” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 639.0113.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Workforce Connections the sum of $300,000 to
carry out the Southern Nevada Health Care Workforce
Apprenticeship Pilot Program established pursuant to section 1 of
this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB413_R1*